Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council

15.310.
Definitions for KRS 15.310 to 15.510, 15.990, and 15.992.

As used in KRS

15.310

to

15.510

,

15.990

, and

15.992

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Basic training course” means the peace officer or court security officer basic training course provided by the Department of Criminal Justice Training or a course approved and recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council;

“Certified court security officer” means a court security officer who is certified under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

;

“Certified peace officer” means a peace officer who is certified under KRS

15.380

to

15.404

;

“Certification” means the act by the council of issuing certification to a peace officer or court security officer who successfully completes the training requirements pursuant to KRS

15.404

and the requirements set forth within this chapter;

“Council” means the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council established by KRS

15.310

to

15.510

,

15.990

, and

15.992

;

“Court security officer” means a person required to be certified under KRS 15.380(1)(c) and who is charged with the duties set out in KRS

70.280

;

“Department” means the Department of Criminal Justice Training of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Fire investigator” means a professional firefighter, as used in KRS

95A.210

, who has been appointed to be a fire investigator and to exercise peace officer powers under KRS

95A.100

, or a deputy fire marshal who has been appointed to be a fire investigator and to exercise peace officer powers under KRS

227.220

;

“Law enforcement officer” means a member of a lawfully organized police unit or police force of county, city or metropolitan government who is responsible for the detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of the state, as well as sheriffs, sworn deputy sheriffs, campus police officers, law enforcement support personnel, public airport authority security officers, other public and federal peace officers responsible for law enforcement, and special local peace officers licensed pursuant to KRS

61.360

;

“Peace officer” means a person defined in KRS

446.010

, or a fire investigator appointed to exercise peace officer powers under KRS

95A.100

or

227.220

;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet; and

“Validated job task analysis” means the minimum entry level qualifications and training requirements for peace officers in the Commonwealth based upon an actual survey and study of police officer duties and responsibilities conducted by an entity recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council as being competent to conduct such a study.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 30; 1978, ch. 155, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 20, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 64, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 606, § 98, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 480, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 54, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 17, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 22, § 9, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 128, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

15.315.
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council is hereby established as an independent administrative body of state government to be made up as follows:

The Attorney General of Kentucky, the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, the commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training, the chief of police of the Louisville Metro Police Department, the chief of police of the Lexington-Fayette Urban County Division of Police, the chief of police of the Bowling Green Police Department, the director of the Southern Police Institute of the University of Louisville, the dean of the College of Justice and Safety of Eastern Kentucky University, the president of the Kentucky Peace Officers Association, the president of the Kentucky Association of Chiefs of Police, the Kentucky president of the Fraternal Order of Police, the president of the Kentucky Women’s Law Enforcement Network, and the president of the Kentucky Sheriffs’ Association shall be ex officio members of the council, as full voting members of the council by reason of their office. The United States attorneys for the Eastern and Western Districts of Kentucky may confer and designate a local law enforcement liaison who shall serve on the council in an advisory capacity only without voting privileges. Each ex officio member may designate in writing a person to represent him or her and to vote on his or her behalf. Designees of the Department of Kentucky State Police, Department of Criminal Justice Training, Louisville Metro Police Department, Bowling Green Police Department, and the Lexington-Fayette Urban County Division of Police shall be the head of the agency’s training division or the agency’s deputy chief or deputy commissioner;

Twelve (12) members shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four (4) years from the following classifications: a city manager or mayor from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, a county judge/executive from a list of three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Counties, three (3) Kentucky sheriffs, a member of the Kentucky State Bar Association, five (5) chiefs of police, and a citizen of Kentucky not coming within the foregoing classifications. No person shall serve beyond the time he or she holds the office or employment by reason of which he or she was initially eligible for appointment. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment and the successor shall be appointed for the unexpired term. Any member may be appointed for additional terms;

No member may serve on the council with the dual membership as the representative of more than one (1) of the aforementioned groups or the holder of more than one (1) of the aforementioned positions. In the event that an existing member of the council assumes a position entitling him to serve on the council in another capacity, the Governor shall appoint an additional member from the group concerned to prevent dual membership; and

Membership on the council does not constitute a public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his membership.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 31; 1978, ch. 384, § 534, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 606, § 79, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 18, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 72, § 8, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 71, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 204, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 204, sec. 4, provides, “Appointees currently serving under the authority of Section 1 of this Act [this statute] shall, as long as they meet all qualifications for service, serve the remainder of their current terms.”

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 15 and 204, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The use of the term “chief of police” in subsection (2) of this section does not include the director of security of the park rangers of the Kentucky Department of Parks, so that one appointed to the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council as one of the five police chiefs required by this section was not eligible for reappointment when he resigned his position as chief of police to take the job of director of the park rangers.

OAG 72-70

.

When KRS

18.140

(see now KRS

18A.115

) is considered along with KRS

18.130

(repealed) it is apparent that the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, as an entity, is covered by the merit system; however, the members of the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, its executive director and his secretary are exempt from the merit system under subsection (1)(c) of KRS

18.140

(see now KRS

18A.115

).

OAG 72-217

.

Where the officer performs such duties by reason of his occupancy of a position, anyone acting legitimately for that officer, even on a temporary basis, falls heir to the right to perform those duties in the absence of a specific statute forbidding the performance of such duties by a deputy or acting officer, so that the acting director of the school of law enforcement of Eastern Kentucky University may sit as a temporary council member of the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and vote on matters coming before it.

OAG 73-693

.

15.320.
Meetings of council — Officers — Quorum — Reports.

The business of the council shall be conducted in the following manner:

The council at its initial meeting to be held promptly after the appointment of its members, shall elect a chairman and vice chairman from among its members who shall serve until the first meeting in the succeeding year. Thereafter, the chairman and vice chairman shall be elected at the first meeting of each calendar year;

A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business;

The council shall maintain minutes of its meetings and such other records as it deems necessary; and

The council shall report at least annually to the Governor and to the General Assembly as to its activities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 3; 2002, ch. 200, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2022 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

15.325.
Members to be reimbursed for expenses.

The members of the council shall receive no salary but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their functions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 4.

15.330.
Functions and powers of council.

The council is vested with the following functions and powers:

To prescribe standards for the approval and continuation of approval of schools at which law enforcement and telecommunications training courses required under KRS

15.310

to

15.510

,

15.530

to

15.590

, and

15.990

to

15.992

shall be conducted, including but not limited to minimum standards for facilities, faculty, curriculum, and hours of attendance related thereto;

To prescribe minimum qualifications for instructors at such schools, except that institutions of higher education shall be exempt from council requirements;

To prescribe qualifications for attendance and conditions for expulsion from such schools;

To prescribe minimum standards and qualifications for voluntary career development programs for certified peace officers and telecommunicators, including minimum standards for experience, education, and training, and to issue certificates to those meeting the minimum standards;

To approve, to issue, and to revoke for cause certificates to schools and instructors as having met requirements under KRS

15.310

to

15.404

;

To approve law enforcement officers, telecommunicators, and other persons as having met requirements under KRS 15.310 to

15.510

,

15.530

to

15.590

, and

15.990

to

15.992

;

To inspect and evaluate schools at any time and to require of schools, instructors, and persons approved or to be approved under the provisions of KRS 15.310 to 15.510, 15.530 to 15.590, and 15.990 to 15.992, any information or documents;

To promulgate reasonable rules and administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to accomplish the purposes of KRS 15.310 to

15.404

and KRS

158.4414

;

To monitor the Law Enforcement Foundation Program as prescribed in KRS

15.410

to 15.510;

To adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business not otherwise provided for; and

The council shall have the authority to certify police officers as set out in this chapter.

The provisions of KRS

15.310

to

15.510

,

15.530

to

15.590

, and

15.990

to

15.992

do not apply to the Department of Kentucky State Police except for the certification requirement established by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 32; 1978, ch. 155, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 300, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 606, § 117, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 480, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 133, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 19, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 139, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2019 ch. 5, § 7, effective March 11, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). This section was amended by 2007 Ky. Acts chs. 85 and 139, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

15.331.
Basic law enforcement training to include training on bias-related crime. [Repealed.]

15.333.
Educational program concerning HIV and AIDS for law enforcement officers. [Repealed.]

15.334.
Mandatory training subjects for law enforcement students — Mandatory in-service training courses for certified peace officers — Administrative regulations — Sexual assault investigation training course — Domestic violence and abuse training.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall approve mandatory training subjects to be taught to all students attending a law enforcement basic training course that include but are not limited to:

Abuse, neglect, and exploitation of the elderly and other crimes against the elderly, including the use of multidisciplinary teams in the investigation and prosecution of crimes against the elderly;

The dynamics of domestic violence, pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS

620.020

, child physical and sexual abuse, and rape; child development; the effects of abuse and crime on adult and child victims, including the impact of abuse and violence on child development; legal remedies for protection; lethality and risk issues; profiles of offenders and offender treatment; model protocols for addressing domestic violence, rape, pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS

620.020

, and child abuse; available community resources and victim services; and reporting requirements. This training shall be developed in consultation with legal, victim services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with expertise in domestic violence, child abuse, and rape. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

Human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency virus syndrome;

Identification and investigation of, responding to, and reporting bias-related crime, victimization, or intimidation that is a result of or reasonably related to race, color, religion, sex, or national origin;

The characteristics and dynamics of human trafficking, state and federal laws relating to human trafficking, the investigation of cases involving human trafficking, including but not limited to screening for human trafficking, and resources for assistance to the victims of human trafficking;

Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall require that a law enforcement basic training course include at least eight (8) hours of training relevant to sexual assault; and

Education on female genital mutilation as defined in KRS

508.125

, including the risk factors associated with female genital mutilation, the criminal penalties for committing female genital mutilation, and the psychological and health effects on a victim of female genital mutilation.

The council shall develop and approve mandatory in-service training courses to be presented to all certified peace officers. The council may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A setting forth the deadlines by which all certified peace officers shall attend the mandatory in-service training courses.

Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall establish a forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course. After January 1, 2019, agencies shall maintain officers on staff who have completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course in accordance with the following:

Agencies with more than ten (10) but fewer than twenty-one (21) full- time officers shall maintain one (1) officer who has completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course;

Agencies with twenty-one (21) or more but fewer than fifty-one (51) full-time officers shall maintain at least two (2) officers who have completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course; and

Agencies with fifty-one (51) or more full-time officers shall maintain at least four (4) officers who have completed the sexual assault investigation course.

An agency shall not make an officer directly responsible for the investigation or processing of sexual assault offenses unless that officer has completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course.

The council may, upon application by any agency, grant an exemption from the training requirements set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection if that agency, by limitations arising from its scope of authority, does not conduct sexual assault investigations.

Any agency failing to comply with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection shall, from the date the noncompliance commences, have one (1) year to reestablish the minimum number of trained officers required.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall provide training on the subjects of domestic violence and abuse and may do so utilizing currently available technology. All certified peace officers shall be required to complete this training at least once every two (2) years.

The council shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish mandatory basic training and in-service training courses.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 11, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 170, § 16, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 171, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 25, § 14, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 58, § 9, effective April 8, 2016; 2019 ch. 55, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 74, § 3, effective April 2, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 11 provided that that Act shall be known as the Sexual Assault Forensic Evidence (SAFE) Act of 2016. This statute was amended in Section 9 of that Act.

15.335.
Residence or voting eligibility not to disqualify peace officer.

No person shall be disqualified from holding a position as a peace officer by reason of his residence or voting eligibility, except as provided in the Constitution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 6.

15.340.
Availability of facilities and services. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

Subject to approval by the secretary, the department may make its facilities and services available upon the following terms:

The department may determine to which law enforcement agencies, corrections agencies, and court agencies and its officers it will offer training;

In determining the law enforcement officers for which it will offer training and in allocating available funds, the department shall give first priority to “police officers” as defined by KRS 15.420(2), public airport authority security officers, and campus police;

Fire investigators shall be offered training by the department;

Except for the officers described in subsection (2) of this section, the department may determine whether persons to whom it offers training or agencies employing such persons must bear any or all costs of such training.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 33; 1976, ch. 300, § 9; 1978, ch. 155, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 386, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2018 ch. 128, § 2, effective January 1, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council is not required to train airport security guards at its expense; however, it may do so pursuant to the authority of this statute, at the employer’s expense, if the council decides to authorize their training.

OAG 73-573

; 72-728.

15.340.
Availability of facilities and services. [Effective July 1, 2023]

Subject to approval by the secretary, the department may make its facilities and services available upon the following terms:

The department may determine to which law enforcement agencies, corrections agencies, and court agencies and its officers it will offer training;

In determining the law enforcement officers for which it will offer training and in allocating available funds, the department shall give first priority to “police officers” as defined by KRS 15.420(2), public airport authority security officers, and campus police;

Fire investigators shall be offered training by the department;

Except for the officers described in subsection (2) of this section, the department may determine whether persons to whom it offers training or agencies employing such persons must bear any or all costs of such training.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section, the department shall accept one (1) qualified constable per training class. The constable accepted shall meet all precertification requirements established pursuant to KRS

15.382

for attendance. The constable shall bear all costs associated with precertification. This subsection shall not be construed to prevent the department from accepting more than one (1) qualified constable per fiscal year, if there are more than one (1) qualified constable applicants and funds are available for their training.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 129, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 33; 1976, ch. 300, § 9; 1978, ch. 155, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 386, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2018 ch. 128, § 2, effective January 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 90, § 27, effective July 1, 2023.

15.350.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

15.350

to

15.370

:

“Police training” includes all formal police training activities in the Commonwealth with the exception of on-the-job training, training conducted at police roll calls, and training conducted by institutions of higher education. The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall, by regulation, define those activities which constitute formal police training and those which do not.

“Police instructor” means any person engaged in conducting, supervising, or teaching in courses of police training as defined in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 160, § 1.

15.360.
Certification of police instructors.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall have the power to certify police instructors and to recertify the same. Said certifications shall be done pursuant to regulations issued by the council for the purpose of assuring high quality police instructors in the Commonwealth. Said regulations may include but are not limited to:

The level of formal or other training possessed by the instructor;

The work-related background of the instructor;

The personal background of the instructor with regard to absence of past criminal record; and

Other such matters as the council may deem to be necessary to insure high quality police instruction for the Commonwealth.

The council shall make no charges for certification as a police instructor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 160, § 2; 1982, ch. 246, § 13, effective April 1, 1982.

15.370.
Certification required for police instruction.

No person shall act as a police instructor or engage in police training as defined in KRS

15.350

unless he shall possess a certification or waiver of certification issued by the council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 160, § 3; 1984, ch. 111, § 21, effective July 13, 1984.